District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

1-307.23a

Establishment of working group to study program alternatives.

Expired.

Sept. 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-155, § 4a
as added Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-298, § 2(a), 52 DCR 1488
Repeal of Part B: Section 16 of D.C. Law 17-196 provided: “The Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986, effective September 23, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-155; D.C. Official Code § 1-307.21 et seq.), is repealed as of the date when the Agency becomes operational.”